Utah statutes.
63A-8-204.   Rulemaking authority -- Collection techniques.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the office shall make rules:

(1)  providing details, as necessary, for the distribution of debts collected in accordance with the priorities under Subsection 63A-8-301(3); and

(2)  to govern collection techniques, which may include the use of:

(a)  credit reporting bureaus;

(b)  collection agencies;

(c)  garnishments;

(d)  liens;

(e)  judgments; and

(f)  administrative offsets.

